Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB466.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 338.991 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any employer who willfully or repeatedly violates the requirement of any section
of this chapter, including any standard, regulation, or order promulgated pursuant to
this chapter, may be assessed a civil penalty of up to one hundred thirty-six
thousand five hundred thirty dollars ($136,530), as shall be adjusted as provided
in subsection (12) of this section,[seventy thousand dollars ($70,000)] for each
violation, but not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each willful violation.
(2) Any employer who has received a citation for a serious violation of the
requirements of any section of this chapter, including any standard, regulation, or
order promulgated pursuant to this chapter, shall be assessed a civil penalty of up to
thirteen thousand six hundred fifty-three dollars ($13,653), as shall be adjusted
as provided in subsection (12) of this section,[seven thousand dollars ($7,000)] for
each violation.
(3) Any employer who has received a citation for a violation of the requirements of any
section of this chapter, including any standard, regulation, or order promulgated
pursuant to this chapter, and such violation is specifically determined not to be of a
serious nature, may be assessed a civil penalty of up to thirteen thousand six
hundred fifty-three dollars ($13,653), as shall be adjusted as provided in
subsection (12) of this section,[seven thousand dollars ($7,000)] for each violation.
(4) Any employer who fails to correct a violation for which a citation has been issued
within the period permitted for its correction may be assessed a civil penalty of up
to thirteen thousand six hundred fifty-three dollars ($13,653), as shall be adjusted
as provided in subsection (12) of this section,[seven thousand dollars ($7,000)] for
each day during which such failure or violation continues.
(5) Any employer found to be in violation of subsection (3) of KRS 338.121 shall be
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 2/11/2025 11:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 460
assessed a civil penalty of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation.
(6) The review commission shall have the authority to modify all civil penalties and
fines provided for in this chapter. The review commission may, at its discretion,
suspend the time period allotted for correction of a violation during the review of an
appeal from the violation in question.
(7) All civil penalties and fines collected under the provision of this chapter shall be
paid into the general fund.
(8) Any employer or individual who knowingly makes any false statement,
representation, or certification in any application, record, report, plan, or other
document filed or required to be maintained pursuant to this chapter shall, upon
conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000),
or by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or by both.
(9) Any person who gives advance notice of any investigation or inspection to be
conducted under this chapter, without authority from the commissioner, shall, upon
conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or
by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or by both.
(10) Any employer or individual who willfully causes bodily harm to any authorized
representative of the commissioner while attempting to conduct an investigation or
inspection under the provisions of this chapter, shall, upon conviction, be punished
by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment for
not more than one (1) year, or by both.
(11) As used in this section, a serious violation shall be deemed to exist in a place of
employment if there is a substantial probability that death or serious physical harm
could result from a condition which exists, or from one (1) or more practices,
means, methods, operations, or processes which have been adopted or are in use, in
such place of employment unless the employer did not, and could not with the
exercise of reasonable diligence, know of the presence of the violation.
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 2/11/2025 11:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 460
(12) Beginning August 1, 2025, the secretary shall annually adjust the maximum civil
penalties provided for in subsections (1) to (4) of this section by the percent
increase in the nonseasonally adjusted annual average Consumer Price Index for
All Urban Consumers (CPI-U), U.S. City Average, All Items, between the two (2)
most recent calendar years available, as published by the United States Bureau of
Labor Statistics. The amount of each adjustment to the maximum civil penalties
shall be rounded to the nearest whole dollar. Beginning August 1, 2025, the
secretary shall begin a three (3) year phase-in for the penalty adjustments. The
adjustments to the penalties shall be effective on each August 1. If the CPI-U is
discontinued or revised, any other historical index or computation approved by
the secretary shall be used for purposes of this section that would obtain
substantially the same result as if the CPI-U had not been discontinued or
revised.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 2/11/2025 11:42 AM Jacketed